Utah statutes.
54-17-401.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Energy utility" means one of the following with 200,000 retail customers in the state:

(a)  an electrical corporation; or

(b)  a gas corporation.

(2) (a)  "Resource decision" means a decision, other than a decision to construct or acquire a significant energy resource, involving:

(i)  an energy utility's acquisition, management, or operation of energy production, processing, transmission, or distribution facilities or processes including:

(A)  a facility or process for the efficient, reliable, or safe provision of energy to retail customers; or

(B)  an energy efficiency and conservation program; or

(ii)  a decision determined by the commission to be appropriate for review under this part.

(b)  The commission may adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to specify the nature of resource decisions subject to approval under Section 54-17-402.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

